Hawaii statutes.
§324-4 Penalty. Any person violating
this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than $500. [L
1963, c 109, §4; Supp, §48B-4; HRS §324-4]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next